Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.08
Child support; withholding of earnings; limitations.

The amount to be withheld from the parent-employee's disposable income under any order to withhold and transmit earnings entered pursuant to sections 42-364.01 to 42-364.12 shall not in any case exceed the maximum amount permitted to be withheld under section 303(b) of the Consumer Protection Credit Act, 15 U.S.C. 1673(b)(2)(A) and (B), nor shall any amount withheld to satisfy a child or spousal support arrearage, when added to the amount withheld to pay current support and the fee provided for in subdivision (3) of section 42-364.01, exceed such maximum amount.

Laws 1974, LB 1015, § 13;

Laws 1986, LB 600, § 8.

The basic subsistence limitation under the child support guidelines was not applicable to reduce the amount being withheld from a father's monthly Social Security benefits to pay his child support arrearages. Ybarra v. Ybarra, 28 Neb. App. 216, 943 N.W.2d 447 (2020).